Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1758.01
Burden of proof.

In any proceeding under the provisions of the Seller-Assisted Marketing Plan Act, the burden of proving an exemption or an exclusion from a definition or from the provisions of the act shall be upon the person claiming it.

Laws 1993, LB 218, § 26;

Laws 2003, LB 217, § 45.